Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6080YC (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.11P, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 8. This section is repealed January 1, 2028 2033 . 3 Sec. 2. Section 422.33, subsection 11C, paragraph c, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 c. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2028 2033 . 6 Sec. 3. 2011 Iowa Acts, chapter 113, section 31, as amended 7 by 2016 Iowa Acts, chapter 1106, section 10, and 2022 Iowa 8 Acts, chapter 1067, section 52, is amended to read as follows: 9 SEC. 31. TAX CREDIT AVAILABILITY. For a retail dealer 10 who may claim a biodiesel blended fuel promotion tax credit 11 under section 422.11P or 422.33, subsection 11C , as amended 12 in this Act and amended in subsequent Acts, in calendar year 13 2027 2032 , and whose tax year ends prior to December 31, 2027 14 2032 , the retail dealer may continue to claim the tax credit in 15 the retail dealerâs following tax year. In that case, the tax 16 credit shall be calculated in the same manner as provided in 17 section 422.11P or 422.33, subsection 11C , as amended in this 18 Act and amended in subsequent Acts, for the remaining period 19 beginning on the first day of the retail dealerâs new tax year 20 until December 31, 2027 2032 . For that remaining period, the 21 tax credit shall be calculated in the same manner as a retail 22 dealer whose tax year began on the previous January 1 and who 23 is calculating the tax credit on December 31, 2027 2032 . 24